Nevada, session 83, AB489.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 41.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.085 1. As used in this section, “heir” means a person who,
under the laws of this State, at the time an action is brought
pursuant to subsection 2, would be entitled to succeed to the
separate property of the decedent if the decedent had died intestate.
The term does not include a person who is deemed to be a killer of
the decedent pursuant to chapter 41B of NRS, and such a person
shall be deemed to have predeceased the decedent as set forth in
NRS 41B.330.
2. When the death of any person, whether or not a minor, is
caused by the wrongful act or neglect of another, the heirs of the
decedent and the personal representatives of the decedent may each
maintain an action for damages against the person who caused the
death, or if the wrongdoer is dead, against the wrongdoer’s personal
representatives, whether the wrongdoer died before or after the
death of the person injured by the wrongdoer. If any other person is
responsible for the wrongful act or neglect, or if the wrongdoer is
employed by another person who is responsible for the wrongdoer’s
conduct, the action may be maintained against that other person, or
if the other person is dead, against the other person’s personal
representatives.
3. An action brought by the heirs of a decedent and the
personal representatives of a decedent pursuant to subsection 2
may be commenced at any time against a natural person who is
deemed to be a killer of the decedent pursuant to NRS 41B.250 or
41B.260 or the personal representative of the estate of such a
killer. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 41B.260 to the
contrary, for the purposes of this subsection, a determination of
whether a culpable actor is the killer of the decedent may be made
at any time by a court or jury. It is the intention of the Legislature
to limit the application of this subsection to natural persons who
are deemed to be killers. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to apply to an action premised on any form of vicarious
liability.
4. An action brought by the heirs of a decedent pursuant to
subsection 2 and the cause of action of that decedent brought or
maintained by the decedent’s personal representatives which arose
out of the same wrongful act or neglect may be joined.
[4.] 5. The heirs may prove their respective damages in the
action brought pursuant to subsection 2 and the court or jury may
award each person pecuniary damages for the person’s grief or
sorrow, loss of probable support, companionship, society, comfort
-
*AB489_R2*

– 3 –
and consortium, and damages for pain, suffering or disfigurement of
the decedent. The proceeds of any judgment for damages awarded
under this subsection are not liable for any debt of the decedent.
[5.] 6. The damages recoverable by the personal
representatives of a decedent on behalf of the decedent’s estate
include:
(a) Any special damages, such as medical expenses, which the
decedent incurred or sustained before the decedent’s death, and
funeral expenses; and
(b) Any penalties, including, but not limited to, exemplary or
punitive damages, that the decedent would have recovered if the
decedent had lived,
 but do not include damages for pain, suffering or disfigurement
of the decedent. The proceeds of any judgment for damages
awarded under this subsection are liable for the debts of the
decedent unless exempted by law.
Sec. 2. NRS 11.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
11.190 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 40.4639,
125B.050 and 217.007, actions other than those for the recovery of
real property, unless further limited by specific statute, may only be
commenced as follows:
1. Within 6 years:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 62B.420 and 176.275,
an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the United
States, or of any state or territory within the United States, or the
renewal thereof.
(b) An action upon a contract, obligation or liability founded
upon an instrument in writing, except those mentioned in the
preceding sections of this chapter.
2. Within 4 years:
(a) An action on an open account for goods, wares and
merchandise sold and delivered.
(b) An action for any article charged on an account in a store.
(c) An action upon a contract, obligation or liability not founded
upon an instrument in writing.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 11.245, an action
against a person alleged to have committed a deceptive trade
practice in violation of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive, but
the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue when the aggrieved
party discovers, or by the exercise of due diligence should have
discovered, the facts constituting the deceptive trade practice.
3. Within 3 years:
(a) An action upon a liability created by statute, other than a
penalty or forfeiture.
-
*AB489_R2*

– 4 –
(b) An action for waste or trespass of real property, but when the
waste or trespass is committed by means of underground works
upon any mining claim, the cause of action shall be deemed to
accrue upon the discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts
constituting the waste or trespass.
(c) An action for taking, detaining or injuring personal property,
including actions for specific recovery thereof, but in all cases
where the subject of the action is a domestic animal usually included
in the term “livestock,” which has a recorded mark or brand upon it
at the time of its loss, and which strays or is stolen from the true
owner without the owner’s fault, the statute does not begin to run
against an action for the recovery of the animal until the owner has
actual knowledge of such facts as would put a reasonable person
upon inquiry as to the possession thereof by the defendant.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 112.230 and 166.170,
an action for relief on the ground of fraud or mistake, but the cause
of action in such a case shall be deemed to accrue upon the
discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts constituting the fraud
or mistake.
(e) An action pursuant to NRS 40.750 for damages sustained by
a financial institution or other lender because of its reliance on
certain fraudulent conduct of a borrower, but the cause of action in
such a case shall be deemed to accrue upon the discovery by the
financial institution or other lender of the facts constituting the
concealment or false statement.
(f) An action pursuant to NRS 41.1335, but the cause of action
shall be deemed to accrue upon the discovery by the aggrieved party
of the facts constituting fertility fraud or of any medical or genetic
disorder which results from the human reproductive material
implanted in, used on or provided to a patient in violation of NRS
200.975, whichever occurs later.
4. Within 2 years:
(a) An action against a sheriff, coroner or constable upon
liability incurred by acting in his or her official capacity and in
virtue of his or her office, or by the omission of an official duty,
including the nonpayment of money collected upon an execution.
(b) An action upon a statute for a penalty or forfeiture, where the
action is given to a person or the State, or both, except when the
statute imposing it prescribes a different limitation.
(c) An action for libel, slander, assault, battery, false
imprisonment or seduction.
(d) An action against a sheriff or other officer for the escape of a
prisoner arrested or imprisoned on civil process.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 11.215 , [or] 11.217 [,]
or 41.085, an action to recover damages for injuries to a person or
-
*AB489_R2*

– 5 –
for the death of a person caused by the wrongful act or neglect of
another. The provisions of this paragraph relating to an action to
recover damages for injuries to a person apply only to causes of
action which accrue after March 20, 1951.
(f) An action to recover damages under NRS 41.740.
5. Within 1 year:
(a) An action against an officer, or officer de facto to recover
goods, wares, merchandise or other property seized by the officer in
his or her official capacity, as tax collector, or to recover the price or
value of goods, wares, merchandise or other personal property so
seized, or for damages for the seizure, detention or sale of, or injury
to, goods, wares, merchandise or other personal property seized, or
for damages done to any person or property in making the seizure.
(b) An action against an officer, or officer de facto for money
paid to the officer under protest, or seized by the officer in his or her
official capacity, as a collector of taxes, and which, it is claimed,
ought to be refunded.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act apply
retroactively to any civil action brought under subsection 3 of NRS
41.085, as amended by section 1 of this act, regardless of any statute
of limitations that was in effect at the time the wrongful act by the
killer occurred, including, without limitation, any civil action
brought under subsection 3 of NRS 41.085, as amended by section 1
of this act, that would have been barred by the statute of limitations
that was in effect before the effective date of this act.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB489_R2*